South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3252.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created the Future of Higher Education Governance Committee to evaluate: (1) the Commission on Higher Education and its effectiveness in carrying out its legislatively mandated missions and goals and whether it is the most effective model for achieving optimal success in the public institutions of higher learning in this State; and (2) the advisability of creating a Board of Regents to coordinate all or most higher education governance statewide as an alternative to the Commission on Higher Education and individual boards of trustees. (B) The study committee is composed of: (1) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House; (2) one member appointed by the President of the Senate; (3) one member appointed by the Chairman of the House Education and Public Works Committee; (4) one member appointed by the Senate Education Committee; (5) one member appointed by the House Minority Leader; (6) one member appointed by the Senate Minority Leader; and (7) one member appointed by the Governor. (C) Members of the study committee shall serve without compensation, but are allowed the mileage, subsistence, and per diem allowed by law for members of state boards, committees, and commissions, to be paid equally from approved accounts of the House of Representatives and the Senate. (D) The study committee shall choose its officers and must be provided with clerical, administrative, and research services by the House of Representatives and the Senate. (E) The study committee shall make a report of its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly before January 1, 2027, at which time the study committee terminates. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----